public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.dic
órleme/gH
ƚèveme/gH
ƚeterar/aE
abrèvieme/gH
akòrđar/aE
aparo/fJL
aparir/fE
apontèleme/gH
arkòjar/aE
asèso/BI
avertiso/fJL
averto/fJL
avertir/fE
bàtoƚeme/gH
balukar/aE
benedísime/gH
bordexar/aE
brikóneme/gH
cucar/aE
deƚibàreme/gH
depariso/fJL
deparo/fJL
deparir/fE
departiso/fJL
departo/fJL
departir/fE
desfórmeme/gH
desfar/aE
deskaxo/BI
deskonpariso/fJL
deskonparo/fJL
deskonparir/fE
despèreme/gH
despaƚar/aE
desparo/fJL
despartiso/fJL
despartir/fE
detarmíneme/gH
devídar/aE
dexgústeme/gH
dexgrosar/aE
dexvòlto/BI
dexvarxéneme/gH
diverto/fJL
dojidar/aE
exàɉereme/gH
féndar/aE
fatalíđeme/gH
fonsionar/aE
framéđeme/gH
frapòsto/BI
galixar/aE
gróngoleme/gH
inɉandoƚísime/gH
inɉavetar/aE
inboƚòñeme/gH
inbovoƚar/aE
infígeme/gH
infoñar/aE
inkúsoleme/gH
inkaenar/aE
inkukar/aE
inparléteme/gH
inpartiso/fJL
inpartir/fE
inpensar/aE
inskartoŧar/aE
inskeƚetrato/BI
intàrseme/gH
intoƚar/aE
ipotiđar/aE
iruxenísime/gH
kanedar/aE
kauŧióneme/gH
koinvòlto/BI
konŧar/aE
konparo/fJL
konpartiso/fJL
konpartir/fE
kontrobaso/BI
konxeñar/aE
krivèleme/gH
maúreme/gH
maldontar/aE
malvosudo/B
mexar/aE
nojar/aE
ordísime/gH
paro/fJL
partiso/fJL
partir/fE
parverto/fJL
pasídeme/gH
pasturar/aE
perintento/BI
pervertiso/fJL
pervertir/fE
profesar/aE
prosèso/BI
purífegeme/gH
reaparo/fJL
refíkeme/gH
rekalsar/aE
rekonpariso/fJL
rekonparir/fE
rekonparso/BI
reparto/fJL
retòlto/BI
rinfàseme/gH
romañir/dE
sanɉòteme/gH
sekuestrato/BI
senpiar/aE
sistémeme/gH
skanpanixar/aE
skonpariso/fJL
skonparir/fE
skonparto/fJL
skorajísime/gH
soɉar/aE
soraespòsto/BI
sorbiso/fJL
sorbir/fE
spónceme/gH
sparo/fJL
spartiso/fJL
spartir/fE
spetar/aE
stankéxeme/gH
strakrexo/BI
strameđar/aE
tónkeme/gH
tikiñar/aE
traxalísime/gH
vèrso/BI
vagabondar/aE
verto/fJL
xɉànseme/gH
xbaregar/aE
xbuéƚeme/gH
xgrameñar/aE
xmàreme/gH
xnarexar/aE
kativo/BI	po:adjective po:noun
menor/D	po:adjective po:noun
mal/D	po:adverb po:noun
se/D	po:pronoun
vòstro/B	po:pronoun po:adjective_possessive
xvantaɉo/D	po:noun
pòsto/BI	po:noun
sètuplo/B	po:numeral_multiplicative
kondiŧional/D	po:adjective
bianko/B	po:noun po:adjective
anglo-meregan/B	po:adjective
fransexa/C	po:adjective
itaƚian/B	po:adjective
taƚian/B	po:adjective
dogador/CV	po:noun
donŧion/D	po:noun
dontativo/B	po:noun po:adjective
sitasion/D	po:noun
ŧukon/C	po:noun
surlo/B	po:adjective
amirasion/D	po:noun
artista/C	po:noun
asimilaŧion/D	po:noun
atribuŧion/D	po:noun
benpensante/D	po:noun
biso/BI	po:noun
definiŧion/D	po:noun
derivaŧion/D	po:noun
desonoridaŧion/D	po:noun
destinsion/D	po:noun
difarente/D	po:adjective
eƚetivo/B	po:adjective
elevaŧion/D	po:noun
eskluxion/D	po:noun
exortasion/D	po:noun
fonŧion/D	po:noun
formasion/D	po:noun
fornidor/CV	po:noun
gato/BI	po:noun
gramadegal/D	po:adjective
informaŧion/D	po:noun
inpaŧienŧa/D	po:noun
inportante/D	po:adjective
inseparàbiƚe/D	po:adjective
introdusion/D	po:noun
kalkolador/CV	po:adjective po:noun
kaloroxo/B	po:adjective
kanpion/C	po:noun
kavaƚièr/C	po:noun
komun/D	po:adjective po:noun
konpoxision/D	po:noun
koronaƚe/D	po:adjective po:noun
kostritivo/B	po:adjective
kuantifegador/CV	po:adjective po:noun
ƚavador/CV	po:noun
ƚavorador/CV	po:noun
lenision/D	po:noun
meridionaƚe/D	po:adjective
mexuraor/CV	po:noun
modèl/B	po:noun
modifegador/CV	po:adjective po:noun
operador/CV	po:noun
opoxiŧion/D	po:noun
pacugon/C	po:adjective
pantaƚon/C	po:adjective
parsonal/D	po:adjective po:noun
pien/B	po:adjective
pikandolon/C	po:noun po:adverb
plurivaƚente/D	po:adjective
prepoxisionaƚe/D	po:adjective
ramengon/C	po:adjective
raprexentante/D	po:noun
responsàbiƚe/D	po:adjective po:noun
ronko/B	po:noun po:adjective
salador/CV	po:noun
señalador/CV	po:noun
secon/C	po:adjective
sfregoƚon/C	po:noun
soƚitúdene/D	po:noun
spaŧeton/C	po:noun
spendaŧon/C	po:noun po:adjective
spiso/B	po:noun po:adjective
springador/CV	po:noun
stornelon/C	po:adjective
tontolon/C	po:adjective
tornidor/CV	po:noun
traskrision/D	po:noun
vòlto/B	po:noun
vokaŧion/D	po:noun
xbaɉafon/C	po:noun
xbeacon/C	po:noun
xlavaŧon/C	po:noun
kaŧador/CV	po:noun
panŧon/C	po:noun
orbolon/C	po:adjective
armador/CV	po:noun
aromatiko/B	po:noun
bail/C	po:noun
balanŧon/C	po:noun
baƚanson/C	po:noun
berluato/B	po:noun
braŧièr/BV	po:noun
kagaor/CV	po:noun
karèr/BV	po:noun
tugo/B	po:noun
sigalon/C	po:noun
depintor/BV	po:noun
dotoron/C	po:noun
